Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 2 Building Authority Division Act
22-2-114. Leasing responsibilities.

(a)

It is the intent of the General Assembly that state agencies be housed, whenever possible, in public buildings as soon as space and facilities in public buildings are available and that the acquisition and granting of leasehold interests in land be regulated and supervised by the Building Authority Division. The division and all other state agencies are authorized and directed to implement that intent as follows:

(1)(A)

The division is given the authority and responsibility to act as the leasing agent for all state agencies and component parts thereof, acting either as lessor or lessee, and to act as the agent for leasing space in all public buildings located in the State of Arkansas.

(B)

In addition, the division is given the authority and responsibility to act as the leasing agent for any nonagency state entity if requested in writing by a nonagency state entity to act in that manner and if the responsibility for the services is accepted in writing by the division.

(C)(i)

After July 1, 1975, no state agency shall enter into or renew or otherwise negotiate a lease between itself as lessor or lessee and a nongovernmental or other government lessor or lessee.

(ii)

The division shall determine the needs of the state agency, locate appropriate rental space, and act as the agent for the state agency in negotiating the lease for the rental space;

(2)

All state agencies and component parts thereof, when requested by the division, shall execute and enter into leases with the division for the leasing or renting of space and facilities in any public buildings. The leases may be upon such conditions, for such terms, for such rentals, and may contain such other provisions that the Department of Transformation and Shared Services and the state agency involved determine to be appropriate and in the best interests of all concerned;

(3)

Any state agency or component part thereof needing new or additional space shall notify the division, and the division shall prepare a lease for the space based upon the standards and criteria as adopted by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services. If space is available in a public building, the lease will be negotiated for placement in the public building;

(4)

If the Real Estate Services Section of the Building Authority Division determines that adequate space is not available in public buildings, the Real Estate Services Section of the Building Authority Division shall act as provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section to obtain adequate space from a privately owned facility;

(5)(A)(i)

The secretary shall adopt standards and criteria for the leasing and utilization of space and the allocation of space to state agencies.

(ii)

These standards and criteria shall be used as a basis for all planning, leasing of space, allocation of space to state agencies, or advising state agencies on leasing considerations.

(iii)

These standards and criteria shall include, but not be limited to, equipment, work stations, private offices, conference rooms, reception areas, general equipment, vaults, and the necessary space to ensure adequate and effective circulation within and access to all state agencies, including parking and traffic patterns.

(B)

In cities and towns having a population of less than twenty-five thousand (25,000) according to the last federal decennial census, for those state agencies providing direct public access services, preference shall be granted to lease space located in existing buildings in the central business district, as defined by the locality's planning commission, or, in the absence thereof, by the municipality's governing body, except in cases where location within the central business district would impair or restrict the intent of the services being provided to the public or the state's proximity to other state or nongovernmental services or where rental rates justify other locations;

(6)

Leases as to office space, buildings, structures, parking lots, and grounds from private individuals, firms, and corporations by state agencies and component parts thereof shall be on a standard lease form approved by the secretary. The standard lease form shall contain all terms and conditions deemed necessary based on the type and purpose of the leased property. The secretary also shall adopt a standard lease form to be used by state agencies when subleasing from the division. Both standard lease forms shall be approved as to the legality of form and content by the Attorney General before becoming a requirement; and

(7)

The division shall obtain and maintain files of all leases in existence from and after July 1, 1975, to which a state agency or component part thereof is a party.

(b)

All leases referred to in this section and all covenants and agreements contained therein shall be binding in all respects upon the parties thereto and their successors, and all the provisions thereof shall be enforceable by mandamus and other remedies provided by law.

(c)

This section shall not apply to the State Highway Commission, the Arkansas Department of Transportation, or the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission.

(d)

If acting as the leasing agency for a state agency as a lessee in a private building, the division shall consult the Arkansas Buildings and Sites Database maintained by the Arkansas Economic Development Commission to determine if there is a property available for lease that meets the practical and financial needs and specifications of the state agency.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 8; 1979, No. 411, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1025; Acts 1999, No. 859, § 1; 2001, No. 238, § 1; 2015, No. 879, §
1; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 32; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 32; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 58; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 58; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6171-6175.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Acts 2016, No. 34, § 3, provided:

“LEASING FROM ARKANSAS BUILDING AUTHORITY. The Board of Hearing Instrument Dispensers shall be exempt from Arkansas Building Authority leasing jurisdiction and procedures as set out in Arkansas Code 22-2-114.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Pursuant to §1-2-303, obsolete language concerning the Building Authority Council has been removed from this section.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 32 specifically amended this section as amended by Acts 2015, No. 879.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment added (a)(5)(B); and made stylistic changes.

The 2001 amendment, in (a), deleted “such” preceding “public” in the introductory language; redesignated former (a)(1) as present (a)(1)(A) and (a)(1)(C); added (a)(1)(B); in (a)(2), deleted “shall” following “thereof,” inserted “shall” preceding “execute,” and substituted “State Building Services Council” for “council”; substituted “subdivision (a)(1) of this section” for “subdivision (1) of this subsection” in (a)(4); redesignated former (a)(5)(A) as present (a)(5)(A)(i) through (a)(5)(A)(iii); substituted “also shall” for “shall also” in (a)(6); and made related changes.

The 2015 amendment by No. 879 added (d).

The 2015 amendment as amended by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, substituted “the division” for “the authority” throughout the section; substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in the introductory language of (a); rewrote the second sentence in (a)(2); substituted “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration with the advice of the Building Authority Council” for “council” in the first sentence in (a)(3); substituted “Real Estate Services Section of the Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Leasing Section of the authority” in (a)(4); and inserted “director with the advice of the” in (a)(5)(A)(i) and twice in (a)(6).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 deleted “with the advice of the Building Authority Council” following “Administration” in (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in the introductory language of (a) and in (a)(4); substituted “Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(2); substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a)(3); and substituted “secretary” for “director” in (a)(5)(A)(i) and twice in (a)(6).

22-2-115. Lease-purchase agreements.

(a)

For the express purpose of providing adequate office facilities, the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services, acting as the primary lessor, may enter into lease-purchase agreements to obtain facilities for state agencies. Each lease-purchase agreement shall contain a provision whereby the agreement shall be cancelled at the close of each fiscal biennium, if necessary, if funds for the payment of the rent under the lease-purchase agreement will not be available.

(b)(1)

The secretary shall make the final determination regarding the location or construction of facilities with the advice and consent of the appropriate state agency.

(2)

All agreements and other matters concerning the buying, trading, selling, renting, renovating, or acquiring of any real or personal property as authorized by this section shall be matters of public record and available for public inspection.

(c)

The General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, §19-4-101 et seq., the Arkansas Procurement Law, §19-11-201 et seq., the Revenue Stabilization Law, §19-5-101 et seq., and other applicable fiscal laws of this state shall be strictly complied with regarding this section.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 129, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-1025.1 — 5-1025.3; Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 33; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 33; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 59; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 59; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6176, 6177.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Pursuant to §1-2-303, obsolete language concerning the Building Authority Council has been removed from this section.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.),
Nos. 7 and 8 rewrote the first sentence in (a); inserted designations (b)(1) and (b)(2); and rewrote (b)(1).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 deleted “and with the advice of the Building Authority Council” following “lessor” in the first sentence of (a).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a); and substituted “secretary” for “director” in (b)(1).

22-2-116. Maintenance responsibilities generally.

(a)

The Building Authority Division shall provide for the management, maintenance, and operation of public buildings as may be required by the provisions and implementation of this chapter, or as may otherwise be required by law.

(b)

The division may enter into agreements with agencies to provide for the management, maintenance, and operation of those public buildings which are not owned by the division.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1026; Acts 2003, No. 364, § 12; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 34; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 34; 2019, No. 910, § 6178.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment added (b); and substituted “Arkansas Building Authority” for “State Building Services” in (a).

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (a); and substituted “the division” for “the authority” twice in (b).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a).

22-2-117. Maintenance responsibilities — Capitol Zoning District.

(a)

As to all presently existing public buildings and capital improvements within the Capitol Zoning District, as zoned by §22-3-302(a), any person or entity responsible for the custody, management, maintenance, repair, operation, or landscaping of such public buildings and capital improvements and their grounds shall be accountable to the Building Authority Division as follows:

(1)

The division shall approve all plans and expenditures for alterations, repairs, maintenance, operation, management, landscaping, and provisions of utilities of and for the buildings, improvements, and grounds;

(2)

The division shall establish and enforce minimum standards and criteria for the maintenance, management, and operation of the buildings, improvements, and grounds, including the establishment of maintenance schedules; and

(3)

The division shall approve the purchase or rental of equipment and supplies for use in the management, maintenance, operation, repair, and landscaping of the buildings, improvements, and grounds.

(b)

The Secretary of State shall remain as custodian of the State Capitol Building and the grounds immediately surrounding the State Capitol Building upon which the State Capitol Building is located. The Secretary of State, except as may otherwise be provided by law, shall have full responsibility for the maintenance, management, and operation of the building and its grounds, including the grounds commonly known as the “Mall Area” to the west of the State Capitol Building and the Capitol Hill Building and adjacent parking areas thereto. The Secretary of State shall not be accountable to the division for such maintenance, management, and operation.

(c)

To the extent necessary to carry out the provisions and intent of this section, all laws relating to the powers, duties, and responsibilities of persons or entities regarding the custody and management by those persons of all buildings and grounds within the confines of the Capitol Zoning District, except for the custody and management by the Secretary of State of the State Capitol Building and its immediate grounds as provided in subsection (b) of this section, are amended.

(d)

Nothing in this section shall be construed as exempting public buildings and capital improvements located within the Capitol Zoning District from any other applicable provision of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1026; Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 35; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 35; 2019, No. 910, § 6179.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “the division” for “the authority” throughout the section; and substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in the introductory language of (a); and added “and” at the end of (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in the introductory language of (a).

22-2-118. Plans, specifications, and estimates of costs.

The Building Authority Division is authorized to employ, except as limited by §22-2-108(9), such persons as may be necessary to prepare plans, specifications, and estimates of costs for capital improvements which, under the provisions of this chapter, are the responsibility of the division.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1027; Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 36; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 36; 2019, No. 910, § 6180.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Publisher's Notes.

The second sentence of Acts 1975, No. 716, § 10, expressed the intent of the General Assembly that the plans, studies, acquisitions, and constructions undertaken or completed by the former Arkansas Public Building Authority should be utilized to the greatest possible advantage of the state and that the expenditure of funds which has occurred for those purposes should, to the maximum extent feasible, not be duplicated.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” and “the division” for “the authority”.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division”.

22-2-119. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning fiscal management and creation of the Arkansas Building Authority Fund, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 186, § 9. The section was derived from Acts 1975, No. 716, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1028.

22-2-120. Exemption from statutes concerning Capitol Zoning District.

(a)

The construction, acquisition, management, maintenance, or operation of capital improvements and public buildings by the Building Authority Division under this chapter is declared to be exempt from the operation and implementation of the provisions of §§22-3-301 —22-3-311.

(b)

The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall endeavor to cooperate with the Capitol Zoning District Commission so as to establish coordinated physical development in the State Capitol area and to promote the uniform and appropriate regulation and development of the State Capitol area.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 716, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-1029; Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 37; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 37; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 60; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 60; 2019, No. 910, § 6181.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (a); and “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration with the advice of the Building Authority Council” for “Arkansas Building Authority Council” in (b).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 deleted “with the advice of the Building Authority Council” following “Administration” in (b).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (b).

22-2-121. Real estate notification.

The Building Authority Division shall notify the Commissioner of State Lands of the Governor's approval of a state agency's request to purchase or sell property under §22-6-601.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 325, § 1; 2003, No. 364, § 13; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 38; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 38; 2017, No. 707, §
78; 2019, No. 884, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6182.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, §
1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment substituted “Arkansas Building Authority” for “Arkansas State Building Services” in the introductory language of (a); added “the Arkansas State Game … Highway Commission” to (a)(1); rewrote (c); and substituted “The authority” for “State Building Services” in (d).

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “the division” for “the authority” in (c) and (d); and deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (d).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 884 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division”.